src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - O - bagwaaniigin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     bagwaaniigin+NI: bagwaaniigin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI: nibagwaaniigin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI: gibagwaaniigin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI: obagwaaniigin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI: ibagwaaniigin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: bagwaaniiginoonh
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: bagwaaniiginoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: bagwaaniiginosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt: bagwaaniiginoban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniiginodin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+4: bagwaaniiginooan
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: bagwaaniiginong
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: bagwaaniiginooan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: nibagwaaniiginoonh
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: nibagwaaniiginoons
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: gibagwaaniiginoonh
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: gibagwaaniiginoons
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: obagwaaniiginoonh
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: obagwaaniiginoons
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con: ibagwaaniiginoonh
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim: ibagwaaniiginoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: nibagwaaniiginom
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: gibagwaaniiginom
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: obagwaaniiginom
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos: ibagwaaniiginom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: nibagwaaniiginosh
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: gibagwaaniiginosh
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: obagwaaniiginosh
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej: ibagwaaniiginosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginonaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginonaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginowaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4: obagwaaniiginoni
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl: obagwaaniiginowaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt: nibagwaaniiginoban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginodin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt: gibagwaaniiginoban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginodin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt: obagwaaniiginoban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginodin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt: ibagwaaniiginoban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Voc+Pl: ibagwaaniiginodin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+4: nibagwaaniiginooan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: nibagwaaniiginong
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: nibagwaaniiginooan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+4: gibagwaaniiginooan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: gibagwaaniiginong
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: gibagwaaniiginooan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+4: obagwaaniiginooan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: obagwaaniiginong
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: obagwaaniiginooan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+4: ibagwaaniiginooan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Loc: ibagwaaniiginong
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pl: ibagwaaniiginooan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: bagwaaniiginoonyish
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: bagwaaniiginoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: bagwaaniiginoonyiban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonyidin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: bagwaaniiginoonsiban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonsidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: bagwaaniiginoonyin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: bagwaaniiginoonying
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonyin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: bagwaaniiginoonsan
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: bagwaaniiginoonsing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: bagwaaniiginoonsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniiginoshiban
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniiginoshidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: bagwaaniiginoshan
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniiginoshing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniiginoshan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt+4: bagwaaniiginobaniin
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniiginobaniing
     bagwaaniigin+NI+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniiginobaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: nibagwaaniiginoonyim
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: nibagwaaniiginoonsim
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: gibagwaaniiginoonyim
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: gibagwaaniiginoonsim
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: obagwaaniiginoonyim
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: obagwaaniiginoonsim
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pos: ibagwaaniiginoonyim
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pos: ibagwaaniiginoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: nibagwaaniiginoonyish
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: nibagwaaniiginoonsish
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: gibagwaaniiginoonyish
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: gibagwaaniiginoonsish
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: obagwaaniiginoonyish
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: obagwaaniiginoonsish
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej: ibagwaaniiginoonyish
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej: ibagwaaniiginoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaa
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+4: obagwaaniiginoonyini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+4: obagwaaniiginoonsini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: nibagwaaniiginoonyiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyidin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: nibagwaaniiginoonsiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsidin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: gibagwaaniiginoonyiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyidin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: gibagwaaniiginoonsiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: obagwaaniiginoonyiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: obagwaaniiginoonsiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsidin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt: ibagwaaniiginoonyiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyidin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt: ibagwaaniiginoonsiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: nibagwaaniiginoonyin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonying
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: nibagwaaniiginoonsan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: gibagwaaniiginoonyin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonying
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: gibagwaaniiginoonsan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: obagwaaniiginoonyin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonying
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: obagwaaniiginoonsan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+4: ibagwaaniiginoonyin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonying
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+4: ibagwaaniiginoonsan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonsing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: nibagwaaniiginomish
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: gibagwaaniiginomish
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: obagwaaniiginomish
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej: ibagwaaniiginomish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+4: obagwaaniiginomini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt: nibagwaaniiginomiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomidin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt: gibagwaaniiginomiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt: obagwaaniiginomiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginomidin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Prt: ibagwaaniiginomiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+4: nibagwaaniiginoman
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoming
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoman
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+4: gibagwaaniiginoman
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoming
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoman
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+4: obagwaaniiginoman
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: obagwaaniiginoming
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: obagwaaniiginoman
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+4: ibagwaaniiginoman
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoming
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4: obagwaaniiginoshini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: nibagwaaniiginoshiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshidin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: gibagwaaniiginoshiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshidin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: obagwaaniiginoshiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshidin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt: ibagwaaniiginoshiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoshidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: nibagwaaniiginoshan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: gibagwaaniiginoshan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: obagwaaniiginoshan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+4: ibagwaaniiginoshan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoshing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nibagwaaniiginonaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nibagwaaniiginonaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginonaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginonaanidig
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Prt: gibagwaaniiginowaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gibagwaaniiginowaadig
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt: obagwaaniiginoniiban
